Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-407
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Resilient Soils and Water Quality Act are to (1) initiate first steps to accelerate the use and scope of best practices for healthy soil management, (2) protect and improve soil and water quality throughout the state, (3) protect the public's health and enhance agricultural production and profitability, (4) address soil health economics, resource stewardship, and managerial and environmental issues, (5) increase awareness, education, and promotion of healthy soil best practices through producer-to-producer, peer-to-peer, and mentoring relationships, networking, and sharing of technical information, and (6) provide observational proof of healthy soil benefits through access to demonstration and research farms and data.

Laws 2022, LB925, § 3.
July 21, 2022